Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Commission for the Blind, for the biennium
beginning July  1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $6,881,100 for operations of
the commission.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,135,397 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Commission for
the Blind.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$18,817,476 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received  by the Commission for the
Blind.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5503 (SB 5503-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5503 (SB 5503-A) Page 2